Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB195.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 36UNLAWFUL POSSESSION AND SALE OR LEASE OF PROPERTYSec.3601. Unlawful possession of dwelling.3602. Perjury.3603. Fraudulent sale or lease of residential real property.§ 3601. Unlawful possession of dwelling.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of a dwelling if any of the following occur:(1) The person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in 12345678910111213141516171819 a dwelling with the intent to commit a crime in the dwelling.(2) The person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in an occupied building with the intent to commit a crime in the occupied building.(3) The person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in an unoccupied building with the intent to commit a crime in the unoccupied building.(4) The person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in a dwelling and intentionally causes $1,000 or more in damage to the dwelling.(b) Grading.--Unlawful possession of a dwelling is a felony of the third degree.§ 3602. Perjury.A person commits the offense of perjury under section 4902 (relating to perjury) if the person does either of the following:(1) Swears with intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of the public servant's duty and the person's false statement is material to the action, proceeding or matter involved.(2) Knowingly presents a false document purporting to be a lease agreement, deed or other instrument conveying or providing a right to or in real property to another person with the intent to civilly detain or to remain upon the real property.§ 3603. Fraudulent sale or lease of residential real property.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of fraudulent sale or lease of residential real property if the person does either of the following:(1) Lists or advertises residential real property for 20250SB0195PN0145 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sale knowing that the person or the purported seller has no legal title or authority to sell the property.(2) Rents or leases residential real property to another person knowing that the person or the purported lessor has no legal ownership or other authority to lease the property.(b) Grading.-- Fraudulent sale or lease of residential real property is a felony of the second degree. Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 68AUNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANCY OF DWELLINGSSec.68A01. Definitions.68A02. Removal of unauthorized individuals.68A03. Removal of squatter.§ 68A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dwelling." As follows: (1) A building, structure, manufactured home or mobile home, or part thereof, used and occupied or intended to be used for human habitation.(2) The term includes any:(i) Outhouse and appurtenance belonging to the dwelling or usually enjoyed with the dwelling.(ii) Manufactured home or mobile home which is used solely for a seasonal vacation purpose.(iii) Residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not the structure is attached to real property.20250SB0195PN0145 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Individual condominium unit, home or trailer, if it is used as a residence.(v) Individual residential apartment in any multiunit building."Holdover tenant." A tenant who stays in a rental property after their lease has ended without the landlord's consent."Immediate family member." As the term "immediate family" is defined in 55 Pa. Code § 178.2 (relating to definitions)."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) A police department of a county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.(2) A county or city district attorney's office.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police.(4) The Office of Attorney General."Law enforcement officer." A member of the Pennsylvania State Police, an individual employed as a police officer who holds a certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training), a sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable."Periodic tenancy." A written agreement between a tenant and a landlord that the tenant will live on the landlord's property for an undefined term until one of the parties issues, in writing, a notice of termination."Squatter." An individual occupying a dwelling who is not entitled to occupy the dwelling under a lease or rental agreement or authorized by a tenant to occupy the dwelling. The term does not include a tenant who holds over in a periodic tenancy if a valid written agreement or lease has been signed and executed by both parties."Tenant." An individual who occupies real property or a 20250SB0195PN0145 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dwelling owned by another based upon a written and executed agreement between the individual and the landlord or owner of the property.§ 68A02. Removal of unauthorized individuals.(a) Affidavit.--The owner of a dwelling or the agent of the owner of a dwelling may request the removal of an unauthorized individual from the dwelling by submitting a sworn affidavit to a law enforcement agency in the county, city or municipality where the dwelling is located within this Commonwealth containing all of the following elements:(1) The affiant is the owner of the dwelling or the agent of the owner of the dwelling.(2) An individual has entered and is remaining unlawfully in the dwelling.(3) The individual was not authorized to enter the dwelling or remains in the dwelling.(4) The individual is not a tenant or a holdover tenant.(5) The affiant has requested that the unauthorized individual vacate the dwelling as provided under this section and the individual has not done so.(6) The unauthorized individual is not an immediate family member of the owner.(7) There is no pending litigation related to the dwelling between the owner and the unauthorized individual.(b) Form of affidavit.--The sworn affidavit requesting the removal of an unauthorized individual from a dwelling must be substantially in the following form:Affidavit to Remove An IndividualUnauthorized to Occupy DwellingI, the owner, or authorized agent of the owner, of the 20250SB0195PN0145 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dwelling located at declare under the penalty of perjury that:1. I am the owner of the dwelling or the authorized agent of the owner of the dwelling.2. The real property is a dwelling.3. An unauthorized individual has unlawfully entered or remained in the dwelling.4. The unauthorized individual is not a tenant, a holdover tenant or an immediate family member of the owner, and any lease that may be produced by the unauthorized individual is fraudulent.5. The unauthorized individual does not have an ownership interest in the property and is not listed on the title to the property unless the individual has engaged in title fraud.6. There is no litigation related to the dwelling pending between the owner, or his or her agent, and any unauthorized individual.7. Notice was provided by hand delivery to the unauthorized individual occupying the dwelling or by posting notice on the front door or entrance of the dwelling, and evidence of the notice, including the date and time of delivery, is attached.8. I understand that an individual removed from the property pursuant to this affidavit may bring a cause of action against me for any false statements made in this affidavit, or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that, as a result of the action, I may be held liable for actual damages, penalties, costs, and reasonable attorney fees.9. I am requesting law enforcement to remove, as soon as possible, the unauthorized individual from the dwelling.10. A copy of my valid government-issued identification is 20250SB0195PN0145 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attached, or I am an agent of the property owner, and documents evidencing my authority to act on the property owner's behalf are attached.I have read and assert the truth of every statement made in this affidavit. I understand that my statements in this affidavit are being made under penalty of perjury.{Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Property Owner}{Contact Information of Property Owner or Agent of Property Owner}(c) Process.--Upon receipt of the affidavit, the law enforcement agency shall verify that the affiant is the record owner of the dwelling or the authorized agent of the owner of the dwelling and appears otherwise entitled to relief. Upon verification and after at least 24 hours from receipt of the affidavit, the law enforcement agency shall serve a notice to immediately vacate on the unauthorized individual. Service may be accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to an unauthorized individual occupying the dwelling or by posting notice on the front door or entrance of the dwelling. The law enforcement agency shall also attempt to verify the identities of all individuals occupying the dwelling and note the identities on the return of service. If appropriate, a law enforcement officer may arrest any individual found in the dwelling for trespass, burglary, theft or any other criminal act, or for an outstanding warrant.(d) Notice.--(1) The affiant must provide notice at the dwelling notifying the unauthorized individual that the unauthorized individual has no right to the dwelling and must vacate immediately.20250SB0195PN0145 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The notice must include the street address of the law enforcement agency where the affidavit will be delivered. (3) A copy of the notice with the date and time of delivery must be attached to the affidavit.(e) False affidavit.--An affiant who knowingly provides a false affidavit to law enforcement under this section may be prosecuted for false reporting to law enforcement authorities under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4906 (relating to false reports to law enforcement authorities).(f) Liability.--No law enforcement officer, governmental entity or political subdivision may be held liable for any action or omission made in good faith under this section, to the extent that the laws of this Commonwealth provide that a law enforcement officer is not liable to an unauthorized individual or any other party for loss, destruction or damage of property.(g) Civil action.--An individual may bring a civil cause of action for wrongful removal under this section against the affiant. An individual harmed by a wrongful removal under this section may have the possession of the dwelling restored and may recover actual costs and damages incurred, as well as punitive damages of triple the fair market rent of the dwelling, plus court costs and reasonable attorney fees.(h) Fee.--A law enforcement agency may charge a fee of not more than $50 to process an affidavit filed under this section.(i) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to limit the rights of a property owner or limit the authority of a law enforcement officer to arrest an unlawful occupant for trespassing, theft, burglary or other crimes.§ 68A03. Removal of squatter.The removal of a squatter under this chapter shall not 20250SB0195PN0145 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require the use of an eviction action.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0195PN0145 - 9 - 12